North Dakota, session 69, HB1093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-06.2-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
39-06.2-06. Commercial driver's license required.
1. Except when driving under a commercial learner's permit and accompanied by the holder of a
commercial driver's license valid for the vehicle being driven, an individual may not drive a
commercial motor vehicle on the highways of this state unless the individual holds and is in
immediate possession of a commercial driver's license with applicable endorsements valid for
the vehicle the individual is driving. This subsection does not apply when the vehicle being
driven:
a. When the vehicle being driven isIs a house car or a vehicle towing a travel trailer being
used solely for personal rather than commercial purposes.
b. When the vehicle being driven constitutesConstitutes emergency or firefighting
equipment necessary to the preservation of life or property.
c. When the vehicle isIs being driven for military purposes, subject to any limitations
imposed by title 49 CFR,Code of Federal Regulations, part 383.3(c).
d. When the vehicle being driven isIs a covered farm vehicle as defined in this chapter.
2. No personAn individual may not drive a commercial motor vehicle on the highways of this
state while the person'sindividual's driving privilege is suspended, revoked, or canceled, while
subject to a disqualification.
3. The provisions of this chapter are waived, asdo not apply to farm-to-market operations by
farmers, but limitedonly with respect to those operators of a farm vehicle that is:
a. Controlled and operated by a farmer.
b. Used to transport either agricultural products, including trees,; farm machines,; or farm
supplies, or both, to or from a farm.
c. Not used in the operations of a common or contract carrier.
d. Used within one hundred fifty miles [241.40 kilometers] of the person'sindividual's farm.
4. The provisions of this chapter are waived asdo not apply to an individual employed by and
operating a vehicle at the request of and within a political subdivision, with a population of less
than three thousand, during an emergency declared by that political subdivision for the
removal of snow and ice. This waiver only applies when the regularly employed driver is
unavailable or the employing political subdivision determines that additional assistance is
required.

H. B. NO. 1093 - PAGE 2
5. Pursuant to the limitations imposed by title 49 CFR, Code of Federal Regulations, part 383.3,
the required knowledge and skills tests may be waived and a restricted commercial driver's
license issued for a single period of one hundred eightytwo hundred ten days or two periods of
ninetyone hundred five days within a twelve-month periodcalendar year to employees of
agrichemical businesses, custom harvesters, farm retail outlets and suppliers, including
retailers and suppliers of trees, and livestock feeders.
6. Pursuant to the limitations imposed by title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, part 383.3, the
holder of a class A commercial driver's license is exempt from the hazardous materials
endorsement, if the licenseholder is:
a. Acting within the scope of the licenseholder's employment, and within the state of
domicile, or another state with a hazardous materials enforcement exemption, as an
employee of a custom harvester operation, agrichemical business, farm retail outlet and
supplier, or livestock feeder; and
b. Operating a service vehicle that is transporting diesel in a quantity of one thousand
gallons [3785 liters] or less which is clearly marked with "flammable" or "combustible"
placard, as appropriate.
7. In accordance with title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, part 384, section 230, the
department may not issue a commercial driver's license to an individual who obtains a
commercial learner's permit unless the individual complies with title 49, Code of Federal
Regulations, part 380, subpart F.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1093 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1093 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State